Illinois, session 104th, SB3274.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $250,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Transportation for expenses related 7to the operations of the Ste. Genevieve - Modoc River Ferry. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.